Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0298.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 57A EXPOSURE TO perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances Sec. 5751. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Eligible research institution" means the research institution receiving a grant under this part to conduct the pilot program. (b) "Fund" means the PFAS pilot program fund created in section 5759. (c) "Hospital reference laboratory" means a secondary or tertiary laboratory that is affiliated with both of the following: (i) A hospital licensed under article 17. (ii) An eligible research institution. (d) "PFAS" means perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances. (e) "Pilot program" means the PFAS pilot program described in section 5753. (f) "Primary care physician" includes, but is not limited to, a physician who specializes in pediatrics and a physician who provides annual physical examinations. (g) "Public water supply" means that term as defined in section 2 of the safe drinking water act, 1976 PA 399, MCL 325.1002. (h) "Qualified county" means a county with a population of more than 260,000 and less than 265,000, a county with a population of more than 650,000 and less than 675,000, or a county with a population of more than 295,000 and less than 300,000. (i) "Qualified study participant" means an individual who, on or after January 1, 2012, meets 1 or more of the following: (i) While under 11 years of age, resided in a qualified county in a household that used water from a well. (ii) While under 11 years of age, resided in a qualified county in a household that used water from a public water supply with a PFAS level exceeding the public health drinking water screening levels for PFAS as set forth in the report dated February 22, 2019, published by the human health workgroup led by the department. (j) "State testing laboratory" means a laboratory described under section 9601. (k) "Well" means an opening in the surface of the earth for the purpose of removing fresh water that is used to provide drinking water or water for domestic purposes. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 299 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.